Washington statutes.
RCW 33.28.020

Fee for examination and supervision costs.

The director shall collect from each association a fee, the amount of which shall be set by rule, to cover the actual cost of examinations and supervision.

[ 1994 c 92 s 449; 1982 c 3 s 57; 1974 ex.s. c 22 s 1; 1969 c 107 s 6; 1961 c 222 s 4; 1945 c 235 s 77; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-196. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 82; 1919 c 169 s 11; 1913 c 110 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.